Massachusetts, session 194th, H3578.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 321 of chapter 94 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Beverage” and inserting in
place thereof the following definition:-
''Beverage'', soda water or similar carbonated soft drinks, mineral water, water and
alcoholic beverages, as defined in section 1 of chapter 138, but shall not include dairy products
or natural fruit juices.
SECTION 2. Said section 321 of said chapter 94 is hereby further amended by inserting
in line 23, after the word “commonwealth”, the following words:- , but shall not include a
brewery, distillery, cidery or winery that only sells its own beverages on its premises.
of 1